Nevada, session 83, AB596.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor
to pay retention incentives in accordance with subsection 5 to
personnel, excluding personnel of the Nevada System of Higher
Education, represented by the bargaining units established in
paragraphs (a), (e) and (f) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515 and for the
costs of implementing the provisions governing annual leave cash-
outs and tool allowances in the collective bargaining agreement
covering such personnel the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $4,942,719
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $5,144,161
2. There is hereby appropriated from the State Highway Fund to
the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor to pay retention
incentives in accordance with subsection 5 to personnel, excluding
personnel of the Nevada System of Higher Education, represented by
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
the bargaining units established in paragraphs (a), (e) and (f) of
subsection 1 of NRS 288.515 and for the costs of implementing the
provisions governing annual leave cash-outs and tool allowances in
the collective bargaining agreement covering such personnel the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $17,928
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $18,094
3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General Fund to
the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor to pay retention
incentives in accordance with subsection 5 to personnel of the Nevada
System of Higher Education represented by the bargaining units
established in paragraphs (a), (e) and (f) of subsection 1 of NRS
288.515 and for the costs of implementing the provisions governing
annual leave cash-outs and tool allowances in the collective
bargaining agreement covering such personnel the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $694,552
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $704,999
4. There is hereby authorized for expenditure from the State
Highway Fund by the Department of Transportation to pay retention
incentives in accordance with subsection 5 to personnel represented
by the bargaining units established in paragraphs (a), (e) and (f) of
subsection 1 of NRS 288.515 and for the costs of implementing the
provisions governing annual leave cash-outs and tool allowances in
the collective bargaining agreement covering such personnel the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,097,722
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,119,729
5. The retention incentives paid from the money appropriated or
authorized by this section must be:
(a) Paid in accordance with the collective bargaining agreement
covering personnel represented by the bargaining units established in
paragraphs (a), (e) and (f) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515.
(b) In the total amount of $1,000 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$1,000 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
6. The sums appropriated by subsections 1, 2 and 3 are available
for either fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not
be committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
fund from which it was appropriated on or before September 17,
2027.
Sec. 1.1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor
to pay retention incentives in accordance with subsection 5 to
personnel, excluding personnel of the Nevada System of Higher
Education, represented by the bargaining unit established in
paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515 and for the costs of
implementing the provisions governing annual leave cash-outs and
tool allowances in the collective bargaining agreement covering such
personnel the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,160,680
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,194,138
2. There is hereby appropriated from the State Highway Fund to
the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor to pay retention
incentives in accordance with subsection 5 to personnel, excluding
personnel of the Nevada System of Higher Education, represented by
the bargaining unit established in paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of
NRS 288.515 and for the costs of implementing the provisions
governing annual leave cash-outs and tool allowances in the
collective bargaining agreement covering such personnel the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,523,615
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,540,314
3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General Fund to
the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor to pay retention
incentives in accordance with subsection 5 to personnel of the Nevada
System of Higher Education represented by the bargaining unit
established in paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515 and for
the costs of implementing the provisions governing annual leave
cash-outs and tool allowances in the collective bargaining agreement
covering such personnel the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $295,689
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $305,324
4. There is hereby authorized for expenditure from the State
Highway Fund by the Department of Transportation to pay retention
incentives in accordance with subsection 5 to personnel represented
by the bargaining unit established in paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of
NRS 288.515 and for the costs of implementing the provisions
governing annual leave cash-outs and tool allowances in the
collective bargaining agreement covering such personnel the
following sums:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $500,868
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $510,866
5. The retention incentives paid from the money appropriated or
authorized by this section must be:
(a) Paid in accordance with the collective bargaining agreement
covering personnel represented by the bargaining unit established in
paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515.
(b) In the total amount of $1,000 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$1,000 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
6. The sums appropriated by subsections 1, 2 and 3 are available
for either fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not
be committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
fund from which it was appropriated on or before September 17,
2027.
Sec. 1.2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor
to pay retention incentives in accordance with subsection 4 to
personnel, excluding personnel of the Nevada System of Higher
Education, represented by the bargaining unit established in
paragraph (g) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515 and for the costs of
implementing the provisions governing annual leave cash-outs,
education pay, footwear allowances, line-of-duty death
reimbursements, uniform and equipment allowances and special
adjustments to pay in the collective bargaining agreement covering
such personnel the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,363,267
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,323,521
2. There is hereby appropriated from the State Highway Fund to
the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor to pay retention
incentives in accordance with subsection 4 to personnel, excluding
personnel of the Nevada System of Higher Education, represented by
the bargaining unit established in paragraph (g) of subsection 1 of
NRS 288.515 and for the costs of implementing the provisions
governing annual leave cash-outs, education pay, footwear
allowances, line-of-duty death reimbursements, uniform and
equipment allowances and special adjustments to pay in the collective
bargaining agreement covering such personnel the following sums:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $2,052,073
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,994,922
3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General Fund to
the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor to pay retention
incentives in accordance with subsection 4 to personnel of the Nevada
System of Higher Education represented by the bargaining unit
established in paragraph (g) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515 and for
the costs of implementing the provisions governing annual leave
cash-outs, education pay, footwear allowances, line-of-duty death
reimbursements, uniform and equipment allowances and special
adjustments to pay in the collective bargaining agreement covering
such personnel the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $180,465
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $183,296
4. The retention incentives paid from the money appropriated by
this section must be:
(a) Paid in four equal installments throughout the fiscal year
beginning in July 2025.
(b) In the total amount of $1,000 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$1,000 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
5. The sums appropriated by subsections 1, 2 and 3 are available
for either fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not
be committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
fund from which it was appropriated on or before September 17,
2027.
Sec. 1.3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor
to pay retention incentives in accordance with subsection 3 to
personnel represented by the bargaining unit established in paragraph
(h) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515 and for the costs of implementing
the provisions governing annual leave cash-outs, pay for personnel
with an intermediate or advanced certification by the Peace Officers’
Standards and Training Commission, uniform and equipment
allowances and special adjustments to pay in the collective bargaining
agreement covering such personnel the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $188,020
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $208,966
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
2. There is hereby appropriated from the State Highway Fund to
the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor to pay retention
incentives in accordance with subsection 3 to personnel represented
by the bargaining unit established in paragraph (h) of subsection 1 of
NRS 288.515 and for the costs of implementing the provisions
governing annual leave cash-outs, pay for personnel with an
intermediate or advanced certification by the Peace Officers’
Standards and Training Commission, uniform and equipment
allowances and special adjustments to pay in the collective bargaining
agreement covering such personnel the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $171,360
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $171,956
3. The retention incentives paid from the money appropriated by
this section must be:
(a) Paid in four equal installments throughout the fiscal year
beginning in July 2025.
(b) In the total amount of $1,000 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$1,000 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
4. The sums appropriated by subsections 1 and 2 are available
for either fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not
be committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
fund from which it was appropriated on or before September 17,
2027.
Sec. 1.4. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor
to pay retention incentives in accordance with subsection 2 to
personnel represented by the bargaining unit established in paragraph
(i) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515 and for the costs of implementing
the provisions governing annual leave cash-outs, recruitment bonuses
and special adjustments to pay, including, without limitation, uniform
and equipment allowances and muster pay adjustments, in the
collective bargaining agreement covering such personnel the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................. $26,379,807
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................. $26,642,993
2. The retention incentives paid from the money appropriated by
this section must be:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(a) Paid in accordance with the collective bargaining agreement
covering personnel represented by the bargaining unit established in
paragraph (i) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515.
(b) In the total amount of $1,000 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$1,000 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
3. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for either
fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which
the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 1.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor
to pay retention incentives in accordance with subsection 2 to
personnel represented by the bargaining unit established in paragraph
(k) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515 and for the costs of implementing
the provisions governing annual leave cash-outs and cancer
screenings in the collective bargaining agreement covering such
personnel the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $171,262
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $172,354
2. The retention incentives paid from the money appropriated by
this section must be:
(a) Paid in four equal installments throughout the fiscal year
beginning in July 2025.
(b) In the total amount of $1,000 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$1,000 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
3. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for either
fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which
the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 1.6. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
to pay retention incentives in accordance with subsection 4 to
personnel, excluding personnel of the Nevada System of Higher
Education, represented by the bargaining unit established in
paragraph (l) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515 and for the costs of
implementing the provisions governing education pay, uniform and
equipment allowances, footwear allowances, line-of-duty death
reimbursements and special adjustments to pay in the collective
bargaining agreement covering such personnel the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $392,010
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $368,575
2. There is hereby appropriated from the State Highway Fund to
the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor to pay retention
incentives in accordance with subsection 4 to personnel, excluding
personnel of the Nevada System of Higher Education, represented by
the bargaining unit established in paragraph (l) of subsection 1 of
NRS 288.515 and for the costs of implementing the provisions
governing education pay, uniform and equipment allowances,
footwear allowances, line-of-duty death reimbursements and special
adjustments to pay in the collective bargaining agreement covering
such personnel the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $393,974
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $370,213
3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General Fund to
the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor to pay retention
incentives in accordance with subsection 4 to personnel of the Nevada
System of Higher Education represented by the bargaining unit
established in paragraph (l) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515 and for
the costs of implementing the provisions governing education pay,
uniform and equipment allowances, footwear allowances, line-of-
duty death reimbursements and special adjustments to pay in the
collective bargaining agreement covering such personnel the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $47,395
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $47,933
4. The retention incentives paid from the money appropriated by
this section must be:
(a) Paid in accordance with the collective bargaining agreement
covering personnel represented by the bargaining unit established in
paragraph (l) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515.
(b) In the total amount of $1,000 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$1,000 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
5. The sums appropriated by subsections 1, 2 and 3 are available
for either fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
be committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
fund from which it was appropriated on or before September 17,
2027.
Sec. 1.7. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor
to pay retention incentives in accordance with subsection 3 to
personnel represented by the bargaining unit established in paragraph
(m) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515 the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ...................................... $6,956
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $6,956
2. There is hereby appropriated from the State Highway Fund to
the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor to pay retention
incentives in accordance with subsection 3 to personnel represented
by the bargaining unit established in paragraph (m) of subsection 1 of
NRS 288.515 the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ...................................... $8,852
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $8,852
3. The retention incentives paid from the money appropriated by
this section must be:
(a) Paid in four equal installments throughout the fiscal year
beginning in July 2025.
(b) In the total amount of $1,000 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$1,000 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
4. The sums appropriated by subsections 1 and 2 are available
for either fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not
be committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
fund from which it was appropriated on or before September 17,
2027.
Sec. 1.8. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor
to pay retention incentives in accordance with subsection 2 to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
personnel represented by the bargaining unit established in paragraph
(n) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515 and for the costs of implementing
the provisions governing annual leave cash-outs and special
adjustments to pay, including, without limitation, muster pay
adjustments and uniform and equipment allowances in the collective
bargaining agreement covering such personnel the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $3,096,857
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $3,150,528
2. The retention incentives paid from the money appropriated by
this section must be:
(a) Paid in accordance with the collective bargaining agreement
covering personnel represented by the bargaining unit established in
paragraph (n) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515.
(b) In the total amount of $1,000 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$1,000 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
3. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for either
fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which
the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 1.9. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor
to pay retention incentives in accordance with subsection 2 to
personnel represented by the bargaining unit established in paragraph
(o) of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515 and for the costs of implementing
the provisions governing cancer screenings in the collective
bargaining agreement covering such personnel the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $40,300
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $40,300
2. The retention incentives paid from the money appropriated by
this section must be:
(a) Paid in four equal installments throughout the fiscal year
beginning in July 2025.
(b) In the total amount of $1,000 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
$1,000 in Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
3. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for either
fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 1.10. 1. With respect to any collective bargaining
agreement to which the State of Nevada is a party and which is
intended to be in effect during all or part of the 2025-2027 biennium,
any provision of such an agreement which requires the Legislature to
appropriate money is void, except for those provisions for which the
83rd Session of the Nevada Legislature specifically appropriated or
authorized the expenditure of money in this or another act of this
session that was approved by the Governor.
2. For the purposes of subsection 1, the provisions of a collective
bargaining agreement which provide for personal leave or union leave
for personnel represented by a bargaining unit established in
paragraph (a), (c), (e) to (i), inclusive, or (k) to (o), inclusive, of
subsection 1 of NRS 288.515 do not require the Legislature to
appropriate money and such provisions become effective regardless
of whether the 83rd Session of the Nevada Legislature specifically
appropriates or authorizes the expenditure of money to implement
such provisions.
Sec. 1.11. The Legislature hereby declares its intent that the
appropriations and authorizations made by sections 1 to 1.9,
inclusive, of this act are one-time grants of money intended to provide
retention incentives and to fund the costs of implementing the
collective bargaining agreement provisions described therein solely
during the 2025-2027 biennium. The appropriation or authorization
of money by sections 1 to 1.9, inclusive, of this act shall not be
construed as an agreement by the Legislature or the State of Nevada
to provide or fund such incentives or other benefits in any future
biennium or to include in any future collective bargaining agreement
the same or similar provisions to the provisions for which money is
authorized or appropriated by sections 1 to 1.9, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 1.12. 1. For personnel represented by a bargaining unit
established in paragraph (a), (c), (e) to (i), inclusive, or (k) to (o),
inclusive, of subsection 1 of NRS 288.515, there must be an increase
in salary of 1 percent for Fiscal Year 2025-2026, and an increase in
salary of 1 percent for Fiscal Year 2026-2027.
2. To effect increases in salaries, as provided in subsection 1,
effective on July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026, there is hereby
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
appropriated from the State General Fund to the Office of Finance in
the Office of the Governor the sum of $4,880,386 for Fiscal Year
2025-2026 and the sum of $10,139,431 for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for
the purpose of meeting any deficiencies which may be created
between the appropriated money of the respective departments,
commissions and agencies of the State of Nevada as fixed by the 83rd
Session of the Nevada Legislature and the requirements for salaries
of the classified personnel of those departments, commissions and
agencies, necessary under the adjusted pay plan, except those
employees whose salaries have been retained, to become effective on
July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026.
3. To effect increases in salaries as provided in subsection 1,
effective on July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026, there is hereby
appropriated from the State Highway Fund to the Office of Finance
in the Office of the Governor the sum of $1,132,216 for Fiscal Year
2025-2026 and the sum of $2,331,018 for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for
the purpose of meeting any deficiencies which may exist between the
appropriated money of the Office of Finance in the Office of the
Governor, Department of Motor Vehicles, Department of Public
Safety and Nevada Transportation Authority as fixed by the 83rd
Session of the Nevada Legislature and the requirements for salaries
of classified personnel of the Office of Finance in the Office of the
Governor, Department of Motor Vehicles, Department of Public
Safety and Nevada Transportation Authority necessary under the
adjusted pay plan, except those employees whose salaries have been
retained, to become effective on July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026.
4. To effect increases in salaries as provided in subsection 1
effective on July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026, there is hereby
appropriated from the State General Fund to the Nevada System of
Higher Education the sum of $459,795 for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
the sum of $940,731 for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the purpose of
meeting any deficiencies which may be created between the
appropriated money of the Nevada System of Higher Education as
fixed by the 83rd Session of the Nevada Legislature and the
requirements for salaries of the classified personnel of the Nevada
System of Higher Education whose positions are included in the
Executive Budget as approved by the 83rd Session of the Nevada
Legislature necessary under the adjusted pay plan, except those
employees whose salaries have been retained, to become effective on
July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026.
5. To effect increases in salaries as provided in subsection 1,
effective on July 1, 2025, and July 1, 2026, there is hereby authorized
for expenditure from the State Highway Fund by the Department of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
Transportation the sum of $533,446 for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and
the sum of $1,097,092 for Fiscal Year 2026-2027 for the purpose of
meeting any deficiencies which may exist between the appropriated
or authorized money of the Department of Transportation as fixed by
the 83rd Session of the Nevada Legislature and the requirements for
salaries of classified personnel of the Department of Transportation
necessary under the adjusted pay plan, except those employees whose
salaries have been retained, to become effective on July 1, 2025, and
July 1, 2026.
6. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 2, 3 or 4
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal years
by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity to which
money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in
any manner, and any portion of the appropriated money remaining
must not be spent for any purpose after September 18, 2026, and
September 17, 2027, respectively, by either the entity to which the
money was appropriated or the entity to which the money was
subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the fund
from which it was appropriated on or before September 18, 2026, and
September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)